Maryland, session 2026, SB0195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1306.
(a) This section does not apply to any person riding in an enclosed cab.
(b) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN individual may not operate or ride on a motorcycle unless the individual
is wearing protective headgear that meets the standards established by the Administrator.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0195*

SENATE BILL 195
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST
21 YEARS OLD WHO:
(I) HAS BEEN LICENSED TO OPERATE A MOTORCYCLE FOR AT
LEAST 2 YEARS;
(II) HAS COMPLETED A MOTORCYCLE RIDER SAFETY COURSE
APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE MOTORCYCLE SAFETY FOUNDATION;
OR
(III) IS A PASSENGER ON A MOTORCYCLE OPERATED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(c) A person may not operate a motorcycle unless:
(1) [He] THE PERSON is wearing an eye–protective device of a type
approved by the Administrator; or
(2) The motorcycle is equipped with a windscreen.
(d) The Administrator:
(1) May approve or disapprove protective headgear and eye–protective
devices required by this section;
(2) May adopt and enforce regulations establishing standards and
specifications for the approval of protective headgear and eye–protective devices; and
(3) Shall publish lists of all APPROVED protective headgear and
eye–protective devices [that he approves], by name and type.
(e) (1) The failure of an individual to wear protective headgear required under
subsection (b) of this section may not:
(i) Be considered evidence of negligence;
(ii) Be considered evidence of contributory negligence;
(iii) Limit liability of a party or an insurer; or
(iv) Diminish recovery for damages arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or operation of a motorcycle.
(2) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a party,
witness, or counsel may not make reference to protective headgear during a trial of a civil
action that involves property damage, personal injury, or death if the damage, injury, or

SENATE BILL 195 3
death is not related to the design, manufacture, supplying, or repair of protective headgear.
(3) (i) Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to
prohibit the right of a person to institute a civil action for damages against a dealer,
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or other appropriate entity or person arising out
of an incident that involves protective headgear alleged to be defectively designed,
manufactured, or repaired.
(ii) In a civil action described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph in which 2 or more parties are named as joint tort–feasors, interpleaded as
defendants, or impleaded as defendants, and at least 1 of the joint tort–feasors or
defendants is not involved in the design, manufacture, supplying, or repair of protective
headgear, a court shall order on a motion of any party separate trials to accomplish the
ends of justice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.